Massachusetts, session 194th, H4097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 277 of the Acts of 2012, shall be amended as follows:
SECTION 1. Amend article 8 by inserting as article 8-6 the following:
“QUALIFICATION FOR VOTING. Every resident of the city or, in the case of an election for
ward councilor or ward school committee member, every resident of the ward, whether a citizen
or noncitizen, who is not otherwise disqualified from voting under state law, shall be qualified to
vote in all preliminary elections, special elections and regular city elections.”, and by
renumbering article 8-6 to 8-7 and article 8-7 to 8-8.
This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1